Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1504
Hearing instrument, defined.

Hearing instrument means any wearable instrument or device designed for, offered for the purpose of, or represented as aiding persons with or compensating for impaired hearing. Hearing instrument does not include a wearable instrument or device with an implantable component such as a wearable processor for a cochlear implant or bone-anchored implant.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 568;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 13.